Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2902
Act, purpose.

The purpose of the Infrastructure Development Investment Program Act is to assist in financing qualified projects by providing loans and other forms of financial assistance to eligible entities for the construction, improvement, or enhancement of transportation infrastructure that is necessary for public purposes.

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 2.
July 18, 2026